Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2

Bank Customer Dispute Resolution Act of 1981

45-1-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Bank Customer Dispute Resolution Act of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 1; T.C.A., §45-1-301.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-301 to §45-1-201 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

Cross-References. Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Law Reviews.

Alternative Dispute Resolution in the Personal Injury Forum (William P. Zdancewica), 26 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1169 (1996).

45-1-202. Commissioner authorized to mediate or arbitrate.

The commissioner has the discretion to mediate or arbitrate a complaint against a state bank made by a customer of the bank.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 2; T.C.A., §45-1-302.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-302 to §45-1-202 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-203. Decision to intervene discretionary with commissioner.

Upon receipt of a complaint, the commissioner shall determine whether mediation or arbitration is appropriate; however, the commissioner's decision not to resolve a complaint shall not be reviewable, and the commissioner shall not resolve a complaint unless the customer and the bank both agree to the resolution. The commissioner shall consider the amount of money in dispute, the complexity of facts and law, the ability of the customer to obtain judicial relief, and other matters that may be relevant to determine whether a dispute appropriately may be resolved by the commissioner's mediation or arbitration. The commissioner, however, shall not resolve through arbitration a complaint involving more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750).

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 3; T.C.A., §45-1-303.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-303 to §45-1-203 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-204. Informal conference or hearing — Mediation or arbitration — Award.

In resolving a complaint, the commissioner may conduct an informal conference or informal hearing or may require that the parties submit written statements or sworn affidavits.

In addition, the commissioner may designate a qualified person, whether or not an employee of the department, to mediate or arbitrate the complaint.

When the commissioner conducts an informal hearing or conference, the parties are not bound by the rules of procedure and evidence pertaining to contested cases.

Upon reaching a decision, the commissioner shall notify the parties with a written award.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 4; T.C.A., §45-1-304.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-304 to §45-1-204 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-205. Award is binding — Review on appeal — Compliance orders.

An award of the commissioner issued pursuant to this part shall be binding upon the parties, but either party may seek to vacate the award in any court with jurisdiction over the original subject matter, by commencing the appropriate original action against the other party within thirty (30) days of receiving a copy of the award.

Review by the court shall be de novo.

If the party against whom an award is rendered does not initiate an appeal as provided in subsection (a) and does not comply with the award, the commissioner shall consider the lack of compliance as a violation of this section and may order the party to comply as provided by § 45-1-107.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 5; T.C.A., §45-1-305.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-305 to §45-1-205 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-206. Commissioner to notify parties of effect of award, right to appeal.

The commissioner shall advise both parties in writing, at the time the award is made, that the commissioner's decision will be binding on both parties unless appealed to a court of law within thirty (30) days, as provided in §45-1-205.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 6; T.C.A., §45-1-306.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-306 to §45-1-206 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-207. Commissioner's rulemaking authority.

The commissioner is granted the power to enact reasonable substantive and procedural rules to carry out the purposes of this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 7; T.C.A., §45-1-307.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-307 to §45-1-207 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-208. Legislative intent — Liberal construction.

This part is enacted for the purpose of providing the citizens of this state with an informal and expeditious method of resolving customer disputes with state chartered banks.

This part is not intended to create a new agency or division within the department. It is intended that the purpose of this part be carried out primarily by existing personnel of the department, or qualified persons designated to resolve disputes by the commissioner, who will act without compensation.

This part shall be liberally construed to effect its declared purpose.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 8; T.C.A., §45-1-308.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-308 to §45-1-208 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-209. General arbitration law inapplicable.

Title 29, chapter 5, part 1 does not apply to an arbitration covered by this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 25, § 9; T.C.A., §45-1-309.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §45-1-309 to §45-1-209 by the authority of the Code Commission in 2020.

45-1-111. Limitation of personal liability.

45-1-129. Electronic applications.